Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 26 Renewable Energy Standard

39-26-1.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

The people and energy users of Rhode Island have an interest in having electricity supplied in the state come from a diversity of energy sources including renewable resources;

Increased use of renewable energy may have the potential to lower and stabilize future energy costs;

Increased use of renewable energy can reduce air pollutants, including carbon dioxide emissions, that adversely affect public health and contribute to global warming;

Massachusetts, Connecticut, and other states have established renewable energy standard programs to encourage the development of renewable energy sources;

It is in the interest of the people, in order to protect public health and the environment and to promote the general welfare, to establish a renewable energy standard program to increase levels of electrical energy supplied in the state from renewable resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 205, § 1.

39-26-2.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter:

“Alternative compliance payment” means a payment to the renewable energy development fund of fifty dollars ($50.00) per megawatt-hour of renewable energy obligation, in 2003 dollars, adjusted annually up or down by the consumer price index, which may be made in lieu of standard means of compliance with this statute.

“Commission” means the Rhode Island public utilities commission.

“Compliance year” means a calendar year beginning January 1 and ending December 31, for which an obligated entity must demonstrate that it has met the requirements of this statute.

“Customer-sited generation facility” means a generation unit that is interconnected on the end-use customer’s side of the retail electricity meter in such a manner that it displaces all or part of the metered consumption of the end-use customer.

“Electrical energy product” means an electrical energy offering, including, but not limited to, last-resort and standard-offer service, that can be distinguished by its generation attributes or other characteristics, and that is offered for sale by an obligated entity to end-use customers.

“Eligible biomass fuel” means fuel sources including brush, stumps, lumber ends and trimmings, wood pallets, bark, wood chips, shavings, slash, and other clean wood that is not mixed with other solid wastes; agricultural waste, food, and vegetative material; energy crops; landfill methane; biogas; or neat biodiesel and other neat liquid fuels that are derived from such fuel sources.

“Eligible renewable energy resource” means resources as defined in §

39-26-5

.

“End-use customer” means a person or entity in Rhode Island that purchases electrical energy at retail from an obligated entity.

“Existing renewable energy resources” means generation units using eligible renewable energy resources and first going into commercial operation before December 31, 1997.

“Generation attributes” means the nonprice characteristics of the electrical energy output of a generation unit including, but not limited to, the unit’s fuel type, emissions, vintage, and policy eligibility.

“Generation unit” means a facility that converts a fuel or an energy resource into electrical energy.

“High-heat medical waste processing facility” means a facility that:

Generates electricity from the combustion, gasification, or pyrolysis of regulated medical waste;

Generates electricity from the combustion of fuel derived from the gasification or pyrolysis of regulated medical waste; or

Disposes of, processes, or treats regulated medical waste through combustion, gasification, pyrolysis, or any process that exposes waste to temperatures above four hundred degrees Fahrenheit (400ºF).

“NE-GIS” means the generation information system operated by NEPOOL, its designee or successor entity, that includes a generation information database and certificate system, and that accounts for the generation attributes of electrical energy consumed within NEPOOL.

“NE-GIS certificate” means an electronic record produced by the NE-GIS that identifies the relevant generation attributes of each megawatt-hour accounted for in the NE-GIS.

“NEPOOL” means the New England Power Pool or its successor.

“New renewable energy resources” means generation units using eligible renewable energy resources and first going into commercial operation after December 31, 1997; or the incremental output of generation units using eligible renewable energy resources that have demonstrably increased generation in excess of ten percent (10%) using eligible renewable energy resources through capital investments made after December 31, 1997; but in no case involve any new impoundment or diversion of water with an average salinity of twenty (20) parts per thousand or less.

“Obligated entity” means a person or entity who or that sells electrical energy to end-use customers in Rhode Island, including, but not limited to: nonregulated power producers and electric utility distribution companies, as defined in §

39-1-2

, supplying standard-offer service, last-resort service, or any successor service to end-use customers, including Narragansett Electric, but not to include Block Island Power Company as described in §

39-26-7

or Pascoag Utility District.

“Off-grid generation facility” means a generation unit that is not connected to a utility transmission or distribution system.

“Renewable energy resource” means any one or more of the renewable energy resources described in §

39-26-5(a)

.

“Reserved certificate” means a NE-GIS certificate sold independent of a transaction involving electrical energy, pursuant to Rule 3.4 or a successor rule of the operating rules of the NE-GIS.

“Reserved certificate account” means a specially designated account established by an obligated entity, pursuant to Rule 3.4 or a successor rule of the operating rules of the NE-GIS, for transfer and retirement of reserved certificates from the NE-GIS.

“Self-generator” means an end-use customer in Rhode Island that displaces all or part of its retail electricity consumption, as metered by the distribution utility to which it interconnects, through the use of a customer-sited generation facility, and the ownership of any such facility shall not be considered an obligated entity as a result of any such ownership arrangement.

“Small hydro facility” means a facility employing one or more hydroelectric turbine generators and with an aggregate capacity not exceeding thirty megawatts (30 MW). For purposes of this definition, “facility” shall be defined in a manner consistent with Title 18 of the Code of Federal Regulations, section 292.204; provided, however, that the size of the facility is limited to thirty megawatts (30 MW), rather than eighty megawatts (80 MW).

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 16; P.L. 2021, ch. 334, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

39-26-3.
Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are to define renewable energy resources and to facilitate the development of new renewable energy resources to supply electricity to customers in Rhode Island with goals of stabilizing long-term energy prices, enhancing environmental quality, and creating jobs in Rhode Island in the renewable energy sector.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 1.

39-26-4.
Renewable energy standard.

Starting in compliance year 2007, all obligated entities shall obtain at least three percent (3%) of the electricity they sell at retail to Rhode Island end-use customers, adjusted for electric line losses, from eligible renewable energy resources, escalating, according to the following schedule:

At least three percent (3%) of retail electricity sales in compliance year 2007;

An additional one-half of one percent (0.5%) of retail electricity sales in each of the following compliance years 2008, 2009, 2010;

An additional one percent (1%) of retail electricity sales in each of the following compliance years 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, provided that the commission has determined the adequacy, or potential adequacy, of renewable energy supplies to meet these percentage requirements;

An additional one and one-half percent (1.5%) of retail electricity sales in each of the following compliance years 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, and 2022;

[Deleted by P.L. 2016, ch. 144, § 1 and P.L. 2016, ch. 155, § 1.]

An additional four percent (4%) of retail electricity sales in 2023;

An additional five percent (5%) of retail electricity sales in 2024;

An additional six percent (6%) of retail electricity sales in 2025;

An additional seven percent (7%) of retail electricity sales in 2026 and 2027;

An additional seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of retail electricity sales in 2028;

An additional eight percent (8%) of retail electricity sales in 2029;

An additional eight and one-half percent (8.5%) of retail electricity sales in 2030;

An additional nine percent (9%) of retail electricity sales in 2031; and

An additional nine and one-half percent (9.5%) of retail electricity sales in 2032 and 2033 to achieve the goal that one hundred percent (100%) of Rhode Island’s electricity demand is from renewable energy by 2033 and each year thereafter.

For each obligated entity and in each compliance year, the amount of retail electricity sales used to meet obligations under this statute that are derived from existing renewable energy resources shall not exceed two percent (2%) of total retail electricity sales.

The minimum renewable energy percentages set forth in subsection (a) shall be met for each electrical energy product offered to end-use customers, in a manner that ensures that the amount of renewable energy of end-use customers voluntarily purchasing renewable energy is not counted toward meeting such percentages. Notwithstanding the foregoing, municipalities engaged in aggregation pursuant to §

39-3-1.2

may include in their aggregation plan terms that would allow voluntary renewable energy products to be counted toward meeting such percentages. In 2024, the commission, with input from the office of energy resources, division of public utilities and carriers, obligated entities, other market participants, and the public, shall assess the impact of allowing voluntary renewable energy purchases to be counted toward meeting the annual percentages. The commission shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the governor, speaker of the house, and senate president no later than September 1, 2024.

To the extent consistent with the requirements of this chapter, compliance with the renewable energy standard may be demonstrated through procurement of NE-GIS certificates relating to generating units certified by the commission as using eligible renewable energy sources, as evidenced by reports issued by the NE-GIS administrator. Procurement of NE-GIS certificates from off-grid and customer-sited generation facilities, verified by the commission as eligible renewable energy resources, may also be used to demonstrate compliance. With the exception of contracts for generation supply entered into prior to 2002, initial title to NE-GIS certificates from off-grid and customer-sited generation facilities and from all other eligible renewable energy resources, shall accrue to the owner of such a generation facility, unless such title has been explicitly deemed transferred pursuant to contract or regulatory order.

In lieu of providing NE-GIS certificates pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, an obligated entity may also discharge all or any portion of its compliance obligations by making an alternative compliance payment to the renewable energy development fund established pursuant to §

39-26-7

.

Retail electricity sales pursuant to a nonregulated power producer’s supply contract that was executed prior to July 1, 2022, shall be required to obtain an additional one and one-half percent (1.5%) of retail electricity sales each year and are exempted from the requirements of subsections (a)(6) through (a)(14) of this section until the end date of the term of the nonregulated power producer’s supply contract.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 218, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 226, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

39-26-5.
Renewable energy resources.

Renewable energy resources are:

Direct solar radiation;

The wind;

Movement or the latent heat of the ocean;

The heat of the earth;

Small hydro facilities;

Biomass facilities using eligible biomass fuels and maintaining compliance with current air permits; eligible biomass fuels may be co-fired with fossil fuels, provided that only the renewable energy fraction of production from multi-fuel facilities shall be considered eligible;

Fuel cells using the renewable resources referenced above in this section; and

Waste-to-energy combustion of any sort or manner, including, without limitation, high-heat medical waste processing facilities, shall in no instance be considered eligible, except for fuels identified in §

39-26-2(6)

.

For the purposes of the regulations promulgated under this chapter, eligible renewable energy resources are generation units in the NEPOOL control area using renewable energy resources as defined in this section.

A generation unit located in an adjacent control area outside of the NEPOOL may qualify as an eligible renewable energy resource, but the associated generation attributes shall be applied to the renewable energy standard only to the extent that the energy produced by the generation unit is actually delivered into NEPOOL for consumption by New England customers. The delivery of the energy from the generation unit into NEPOOL must be generated by:

A unit-specific bilateral contract for the sale and delivery of such energy into NEPOOL; and

Confirmation from ISO-New England that the renewable energy was actually settled in the NEPOOL system; and

Confirmation through the North American Reliability Council tagging system that the import of the energy into NEPOOL actually occurred; or

Any such other requirements as the commission deems appropriate.

NE-GIS certificates associated with energy production from off-grid generation and customer-sited generation facilities certified by the commission as eligible renewable energy resources may also be used to demonstrate compliance, provided that the facilities are physically located in Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 334, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

39-26-6.
Duties of the commission.

The commission shall:

Develop and adopt regulations on or before December 31, 2005, for implementing a renewable energy standard, which regulations shall include, but be limited to, provisions for:

Verifying the eligibility of renewable energy generators and the production of energy from such generators, including requirements to notify the commission in the event of a change in a generator’s eligibility status;

Standards for contracts and procurement plans for renewable energy resources to achieve the purposes of this chapter;

Flexibility mechanisms for the purposes of easing compliance burdens; facilitating bringing new renewable resources on-line; and avoiding and/or mitigating conflicts with state-level source disclosure requirements and green marketing claims throughout the region; which flexibility mechanisms shall allow obligated entities to: (A) Demonstrate compliance over a compliance year; and (B) Bank excess compliance for two (2) subsequent compliance years, capped at thirty percent (30%) of the current year’s obligation; and

Annual compliance filings to be made by all obligated entities within one month after NE-GIS reports are available for the fourth (4th) quarter of each calendar year. All electric-utility-distribution companies shall cooperate with the commission in providing data necessary to assess the magnitude of obligation and verify the compliance of all obligated entities.

Authorize rate recovery by electric-utility-distribution companies of all prudent incremental costs arising from the implementation of this chapter, including, without limitation: the purchase of NE-GIS certificates; the payment of alternative compliance payments; required payments to support the NE-GIS; assessments made pursuant to §

39-26-7(c)

; and the incremental costs of complying with energy source disclosure requirements.

Certify eligible renewable energy resources by issuing statements of qualification within ninety (90) days of application. The commission shall provide prospective reviews for applicants seeking to determine whether a facility would be eligible.

[Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 218, § 1 and P.L. 2022, ch. 226, § 1.]

Establish sanctions for those obligated entities that, after investigation, have been found to fail to reasonably comply with the commission’s regulations. No sanction or penalty shall relieve or diminish an obligated entity from liability for fulfilling any shortfall in its compliance obligation; provided, however, that no sanction shall be imposed if compliance is achieved through alternative compliance payments. The commission may suspend or revoke the certification of generation units, certified in accordance with subsection (a)(3) of this section, that are found to provide false information or that fail to notify the commission in the event of a change in eligibility status or otherwise comply with its rules. Financial penalties resulting from sanctions from obligated entities shall not be recoverable in rates.

Report, by February 15, 2006, and by February 15 each year thereafter, to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate on the status of the implementation of the renewable energy standards in Rhode Island and other states, and which report shall include in 2009, and each year thereafter, the level of use of renewable energy certificates by eligible renewable energy resources and the portion of renewable energy standards met through alternative compliance payments, and the amount of rate increases authorized pursuant to subsection (a)(2) of this section.

Consistent with the public policy objective of developing renewable generation as an option in Rhode Island, and subject to the review and approval of the commission, the electric distribution company is authorized to propose and implement pilot programs to own and operate no more than fifteen megawatts (15 MW) of renewable-generation demonstration projects in Rhode Island and may include the costs and benefits in rates to distribution customers. At least two (2) demonstration projects shall include renewable generation installed at, or in the vicinity of nonprofit, affordable-housing projects where energy savings benefits are provided to reduce electric bills of the customers at the nonprofit, affordable-housing projects. Any renewable-generation proposals shall be subject to the review and approval of the commission. The commission shall annually make an adjustment to the minimum amounts required under the renewable energy standard under this chapter in an amount equal to the kilowatt hours generated by such units owned by the electric distribution company. The electric and gas distribution company shall also be authorized to propose and implement smart-metering and smart-grid demonstration projects in Rhode Island, subject to the review and approval of the commission, in order to determine the effectiveness of such new technologies for reducing and managing energy consumption, and may include the costs of such demonstration projects in distribution rates to electric customers to the extent the project pertains to electricity usage and in distribution rates to gas customers to the extent the project pertains to gas usage.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 218, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 226, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

39-26-7.
Renewable energy development fund.

There is hereby authorized and created within the Rhode Island commerce corporation a renewable energy development fund for the purpose of increasing the supply of NE-GIS certificates available for compliance in future years by obligated entities with renewable energy standard requirements, as established in this chapter. The fund shall be located at the Rhode Island commerce corporation. The Rhode Island commerce corporation shall administer the fund and adopt plans and guidelines for the management and use of the fund in coordination with the office of energy resources and the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

The Rhode Island commerce corporation shall enter into agreements with obligated entities to accept alternative compliance payments, consistent with rules of the commission and the purposes set forth in this section; and alternative compliance payments received pursuant to this section shall be trust funds to be held and applied solely for the purposes set forth in this section.

The uses of the fund shall include but not be limited to:

Stimulating investment in renewable energy development by entering into agreements, including multiyear agreements, for renewable energy certificates;

Establishing and maintaining a residential renewable energy program using eligible technologies in accordance with §

39-26-5

;

Providing technical and financial assistance to municipalities for interconnection and feasibility studies, and/or the installation of renewable energy projects;

Implementing and supporting commercial and residential property assessed clean-energy projects;

Issuing assurances and/or guarantees to support the acquisition of renewable energy certificates and/or the development of new renewable energy sources for Rhode Island;

Establishing escrows, reserves, and/or acquiring insurance for the obligations of the fund;

Paying administrative costs of the fund incurred by the Rhode Island commerce corporation, the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, and the office of energy resources, not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the income of the fund, including, but not limited to, alternative compliance payments. All funds transferred from the Rhode Island commerce corporation to support the office of energy resources’ administrative costs shall be deposited as restricted receipts.

All applications received for the use of the fund shall be reviewed by the Rhode Island commerce corporation in consultation with the office of energy resources and the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

NE-GIS certificates acquired through the fund may be conveyed to obligated entities or may be credited against the renewable energy standard for the year of the certificate provided that the commission assesses the cost of the certificates to the obligated entity, or entities, benefiting from the credit against the renewable energy standard, which assessment shall be reduced by previously made alternative compliance payments and shall be paid to the fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 8; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 8; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 28, § 7; P.L. 2008, ch. 228, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 422, § 4; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 4, § 15; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 7.

39-26-8.
Interaction with other policies.

Rhode Island has established a system-benefits charge (SBC), a portion of which is dedicated to supporting renewable energy, administered in accordance with the provisions of §

39-2-1.2(b)

and (c); other states have similar policies. The office of energy resources is hereby directed to collaborate with the division of public utilities and carriers, the trustees of the renewable energy development fund, the distribution company with other interests and parties, as appropriate, in maximizing the combined impact and efficiency of the renewable energy program established by §

39-2-1.2(b)

and (c) and the renewable energy standard.

It is the intent of this chapter that generation attributes and NE-GIS certificates applied towards Rhode Island renewable energy standard compliance may not be used towards compliance with state renewable energy obligations relating to an obligated entity’s load in other states.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 8; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 8.

39-26-9.
Energy source disclosure requirements.

The commission shall, by March 31, 2005, establish and enforce right-to-know regulations requiring any obligated entity to distribute energy source disclosures to all customers of each electrical energy product offered.

The energy source disclosure shall indicate what sources of energy were used to generate electricity for each electrical energy product, expressed as a percentage of the total amount of energy used towards each electrical energy product. The energy source disclosure shall show the percentages of energy obtained from each of the eligible renewable energy resources, as well as the percentage of energy obtained from nuclear plants, natural gas, oil (which may include any fossil fuel), hydroelectric plants that are not eligible renewable energy resources, coal, and any other sources that the commission may require to be included. The energy source disclosure shall also indicate the emissions created as a result of generating the electricity.

Energy source disclosures shall be distributed to consumers on a quarterly basis. The obligated entities shall be allowed to recover in rates all incremental costs associated with preparation and distribution of the disclosure label.

The commission shall allow for or require the use of NE-GIS certificates for the calculation of the energy source disclosure.

The energy source disclosure presented to any particular end-use customer shall take into consideration and account for voluntary purchases of generation attributes or related products, including purchases made by the end-use customer from providers other than the obligated entity, even if the end-use customer is billed by the obligated entity and also served by that obligated entity’s electrical energy product.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 205, § 1.

39-26-10.
Severability and construction.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable. The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to give effect to the purposes thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 205, § 1.